Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Nondomiciliaries

53-9-20.
Presumption or proof of death.

If an individual who is domiciled outside this state and possessed of any interest in or claim to or against real or personal property or cause of action located in this state shall have been absent for a period of time under circumstances whereby, pursuant to the law of the place in which the individual is domiciled, the individual is presumed to be dead, and a court of competent jurisdiction in the place of domicile has entered a final order or decree that the individual is presumed to be dead, the provisions of this title shall apply in every respect as if the individual in fact had died. If the individual shall have been absent for a period of not less than four years and shall not have been declared dead in the domiciliary jurisdiction, the individual may be declared dead in this state pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of this chapter, as if a domiciliary of this state, for purposes of the property interests or claims or causes of action located in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-21.
Appointment of conservator.

If an individual domiciled outside this state is possessed of any interest in or claim to or against any real or personal property or cause of action located in this state and would, if a domiciliary, be deemed to be missing in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 53-9-10 or if a conservator or any person serving in a similar capacity shall have been authorized to handle the property of the individual in the jurisdiction in which the individual is domiciled, the probate court may appoint a conservator of all of the interests or claims or causes of action located in this state and give direction as to the conservation of the property and its use in the interest of the missing individual or that individual’s dependents, obligees, or successors in interest. The court shall mold such order in aid of any similar orders from the jurisdiction in which the individual is domiciled, may appoint the domiciliary conservator as the conservator in this state, and may authorize delivery of property to the domiciliary conservator. Except as the court may otherwise direct, the proceedings shall conform to the provisions of Article 2 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.